Hawaii statutes.
§241-4.5 Capital goods excise tax credit.
The capital goods excise tax credit provided under section 235-110.7 shall be
operative for this chapter after December 31, 1987; provided that the capital
goods excise tax credit shall be inoperative after December 31, 2008, and
before January 1, 2010. [L 1987, c 239, §8; am L 2009, c 178, §5]

Note

The 2009 amendment applies to investments made, renovation
costs incurred, or eligible depreciable tangible property placed in service on
or after May 1, 2009. L 2009, c 178, §10.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next